Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1432HV (1) 91 je/jh H.F. 420 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âWorkforce First Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION GOVERNED BY THE 3 STATE BOARD OF REGENTS ââ REVIEW OF ACADEMIC PROGRAMS. 4 1. No later than the first meeting of the state board of 5 regents occurring on or after November 1, 2025, the board shall 6 complete a review of all undergraduate and graduate academic 7 programs offered at institutions of higher education governed 8 by the board. The purpose of the review shall be to determine 9 whether and to what extent each academic program aligns with 10 current and future workforce needs in this state. The board 11 shall conduct the review in consultation with the department of 12 education and the department of workforce development. 13 2. The board shall submit a report on the results of the 14 review to the governor and the general assembly no later than 15 November 30, 2025. For each academic program reviewed, the 16 report shall recommend that the program remain unchanged, 17 recommend that the program be eliminated, or recommend that the 18 program be changed and describe recommended changes. 19